Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.140

Annual conference of health officers.

In order to receive the assistance and advice of local health officers in carrying out the secretary's duties and responsibilities, the secretary of health shall hold annually a conference of local health officers, at such place as the secretary deems convenient, for the discussion of questions pertaining to public health, sanitation, and other matters pertaining to the duties and functions of the local health departments, which shall continue in session for such time not exceeding three days as the secretary deems necessary.

The health officer of each county, district, municipality and county-city department shall attend such conference during its entire session, and receive therefor his or her actual and necessary traveling expenses, to be paid by his or her county, district, and municipality or county-city department. No claim for such expenses shall be allowed or paid unless it is accompanied by a certificate from the secretary of health attesting the attendance of the claimant.

[ 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 253; 1979 c 141 s 50; 1967 ex.s. c 102 s 10; 1965 c 8 s 43.20.060. Prior: 1915 c 75 s 1; RRS s 6005. Formerly RCW 43.20A.615 and 43.20.060.]

NOTES:

Severability—1967 ex.s. c 102: See note following RCW 43.70.130.